sk_SK-lemma/sk_SK.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aoeintsvrlkmdpuhjzácbyčžíšýúťéľôďgfňäóŕxĺwěřqůAOEINTSVRLKMDPUHJZÁCBYČŽÍŠÝÚŤÉĽÔĎGFŇÄÓŔXĹWĚŘQŮ
REP 52
REP a á
REP á a
REP í i
REP i í
REP ó o
REP o ó
REP o ô
REP ú u
REP u ú
REP u ű
REP ű ü
REP ü ű
REP y z
REP z y
REP 2 ľ
REP 3 š
REP 4 č
REP 5 ť
REP 6 ž
REP 7 ý
REP 8 á
REP 9 í
REP 0 é
REP a ä
REP e ä
REP ä e
REP y ý
REP ý y
REP ý í
REP í ý
REP c č
REP č c
REP p b
REP b p
REP s z
REP z s
REP d ď
REP ď d
REP z ž
REP ž z
REP n ň
REP ň n
REP s š
REP š s
REP e é
REP é e
REP l ľ
REP l ĺ
REP ľ l
REP ĺ l
REP ĺ ľ
REP ľ ĺ
FLAG num
LANG sk_SK
SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 ec ca .
SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 ec covi .
SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 ec com .
SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 ec ci .
SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 ec cov .
SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 ec coch .
SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 ec cami .
SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 a y .
SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 a e .
SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 a u .
SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 a ou .
SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 ka ok .
SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 0 m .
SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 0 ch .
SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 mi .
SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 o a .
SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 o u .
SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 a i .
SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 0 a .
SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 0 ovi .
SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 0 om .
SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 0 ia .
SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 0 ov .
SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 0 och .
SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 ka iek .
SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 a ám .
SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 a ách .
SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 0 u .
SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 0 e .
SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 0 ovia .
SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 0 ami .
SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 0 ých .
SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 0 ým .
SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 0 ými .
SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 0 ej .
SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 0 ou .
SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 0 ho .
SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 0 mu .
SFX 39 N 1
SFX 39 0 i .
SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 0 o .
SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 i ov .
SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 i om .
SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 i och .
SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 i ami .
SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 es a .
SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 es ovi .
SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 es om .
SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 es ovia .
SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 es ov .
SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 es och .
SFX 51 N 1
SFX 51 es mi .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 a 0 .
PFX 52 Y 1
PFX 52 A Á .
SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 0 vi .
SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 0 via .
SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 0 v .
SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 o ami .
SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 ela iel .
SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 ica íc .
SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 a iam .
SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 a iach .
SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 ina ín .
SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 o mi .
SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 a 0 .
SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 ena én .
SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 a í .
SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 ana án .
SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 ena ien .
SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 er ra .
SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 er rovi .
SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 er rom .
SFX 71 N 1
SFX 71 er rovia .
SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 er rov .
SFX 73 N 1
SFX 73 er roch .
SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 er rami .
SFX 75 N 1
SFX 75 ra ier .
SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 eta iet .
SFX 77 N 1
SFX 77 ika ík .
SFX 78 N 1
SFX 78 na ien .
SFX 79 N 1
SFX 79 um a .
SFX 80 N 1
SFX 80 m 0 .
SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 um e .
SFX 82 N 1
SFX 82 um om .
SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 y 0 .
SFX 84 N 1
SFX 84 y am .
SFX 85 N 1
SFX 85 y ach .
SFX 86 N 1
SFX 86 y ami .
SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 amy ám .
SFX 88 N 1
SFX 88 y ám .
SFX 89 N 1
SFX 89 y ách .
SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 ora ôr .
SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 ok ka .
SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 ok kovi .
SFX 93 N 1
SFX 93 ok ku .
SFX 94 N 1
SFX 94 ok kom .
SFX 95 N 1
SFX 95 á ej .
SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 á ú .
SFX 97 N 1
SFX 97 á ou .
SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 h že .
SFX 99 N 1
SFX 99 e a .
SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 e u .
SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 ie í .
SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 ie ím .
SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 e am .
SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 e ach .
SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 e ami .
SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 ila íl .
SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 ice íc .
SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 e iam .
SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 e iach .
SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 ava áv .
SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 ara ár .
SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 k ci .
SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 any ian .
SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 y om .
SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 y och .
SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 y mi .
SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 o e .
SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 ita ít .
SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 é om .
SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 é ým .
SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 ť ti .
SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 0 y .
SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 ec cu .
SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 s 0 .
SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 us e .
SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 us om .
SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 es ami .
SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 isa ís .
SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 ota ôt .
SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 y ov .
SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 a ovi .
SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 a om .
SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 era ier .
SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 ek ka .
SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 ek kovi .
SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 ek kom .
SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 ek kovia .
SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 ek kov .
SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 ek koch .
SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 ek kami .
SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 a ovia .
SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 a ov .
SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 a och .
SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 e ovi .
SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 e om .
SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 e ovia .
SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 e ov .
SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 e och .
SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 e mi .
SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 iga íg .
SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 inki ínk .
SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 i ám .
SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 i ách .
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 a 0 .
PFX 154 Y 1
PFX 154 Hi Hí .
SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 ida íd .
SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 eľ ľa .
SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 eľ ľu .
SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 eľ li .
SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 eľ ľom .
SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 ma iem .
SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 y ých .
SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 y ým .
SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 y ými .
SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 ňa ne .
SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 ňa ni .
SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 ň ne .
SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 ň ni .
SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 us a .
SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 us ovi .
SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 us ovia .
SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 us ov .
SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 us och .
SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 us ami .
SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 ce iec .
SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 uce úc .
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 a 0 .
PFX 176 Y 1
PFX 176 La Lá .
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 a 0 .
PFX 177 Y 1
PFX 177 Li Lí .
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 a 0 .
PFX 178 Y 1
PFX 178 Lu Lú .
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 a 0 .
PFX 179 Y 1
PFX 179 Ma Má .
SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 ivy ív .
SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 anna ánn .
SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 ilda íld .
SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 ada ád .
SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 ama ám .
SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 aša áš .
SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 ery ier .
SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 e i .
SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 ec če .
SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 ľga lieg .
SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 el la .
SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 el lovi .
SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 el lom .
SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 el lovia .
SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 el lov .
SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 el loch .
SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 el lami .
SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 ol la .
SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 ol lovi .
SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 ol lom .
SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 ol lovia .
SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 ol lov .
SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 ol loch .
SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 ol lami .
SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 la iel .
SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 eň ne .
SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 eň ni .
SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 eň ňou .
SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 os a .
SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 s vi .
SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 s m .
SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 s via .
SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 s v .
SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 s ch .
SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 os ami .
SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 as ovi .
SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 as om .
SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 er ru .
SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 er ri .
SFX 219 N 1
SFX 219 ona ôn .
SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 ňa ní .
SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 ňa niam .
SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 ňa niach .
SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 e í .
SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 us mi .
SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 ľa le .
SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 ľa li .
SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 iec ca .
SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 iec cu .
SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 iec ci .
SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 iec com .
SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 yňa ýň .
SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 uľa úľ .
SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 ľa liam .
SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 ľa liach .
SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 ý ého .
SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 ý ému .
SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 ý om .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 a 0 .
PFX 238 Y 1
PFX 238 Va Vá .
SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 ec covia .
SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 e 0 .
SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 asta ást .
SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 le eľ .
SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 le ľam .
SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 le ľoch .
SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 le ľami .
SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 i eho .
SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 i emu .
SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 Zeus Dia .
SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 Zeus Diovi .
SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 Zeus Diom .
SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 iša íš .
SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 y eho .
SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 y emu .
SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 y i .
SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 y e .
SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 y a .
SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 y ej .
SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 y u .
SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 y ou .
SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 ý í .
SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 ý é .
SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 ý á .
SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 ý ej .
SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 ý ú .
SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 ý ou .
SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 ovať ujem .
SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 ovať uješ .
SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 ovať uje .
SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 ovať ujeme .
SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 ovať ujete .
SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 ovať ujú .
SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 ovať uj .
SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 ovať ujme .
SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 ovať ujte .
SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 ovať ujúc .
SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 ť l .
SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 ť la .
SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 ť lo .
SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 ť li .
SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 eda ied .
SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 ý ejší .
SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 ý ejšieho .
SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 ý ejšiemu .
SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 ý ejšom .
SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 ý ejším .
SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 ý ejších .
SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 ý ejšími .
SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 ý ejšie .
SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 ý ejšia .
SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 ý ejšej .
SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 ý ejšiu .
SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 ý ejšou .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 ý ejší .
PFX 293 Y 1
PFX 293 0 naj .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 ý ejšieho .
PFX 294 Y 1
PFX 294 0 naj .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 ý ejšiemu .
PFX 295 Y 1
PFX 295 0 naj .
SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 ý ejšom .
PFX 296 Y 1
PFX 296 0 naj .
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 ý ejším .
PFX 297 Y 1
PFX 297 0 naj .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 ý ejších .
PFX 298 Y 1
PFX 298 0 naj .
SFX 299 Y 1
SFX 299 ý ejšími .
PFX 299 Y 1
PFX 299 0 naj .
SFX 300 Y 1
SFX 300 ý ejšie .
PFX 300 Y 1
PFX 300 0 naj .
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 ý ejšia .
PFX 301 Y 1
PFX 301 0 naj .
SFX 302 Y 1
SFX 302 ý ejšej .
PFX 302 Y 1
PFX 302 0 naj .
SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303 ý ejšiu .
PFX 303 Y 1
PFX 303 0 naj .
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 ý ejšou .
PFX 304 Y 1
PFX 304 0 naj .
SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305 0 jšie .
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 0 jšie .
PFX 306 Y 1
PFX 306 0 naj .
SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 ť tí .
SFX 308 N 1
SFX 308 ť tiam .
SFX 309 N 1
SFX 309 ť tiach .
SFX 310 N 1
SFX 310 y ejší .
SFX 311 N 1
SFX 311 y ejšieho .
SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 y ejšiemu .
SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 y ejšom .
SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 y ejším .
SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 y ejších .
SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 y ejšími .
SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 y ejšie .
SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 y ejšia .
SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 y ejšej .
SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 y ejšiu .
SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 y ejšou .
SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 y ejší .
PFX 322 Y 1
PFX 322 0 naj .
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 y ejšieho .
PFX 323 Y 1
PFX 323 0 naj .
SFX 324 Y 1
SFX 324 y ejšiemu .
PFX 324 Y 1
PFX 324 0 naj .
SFX 325 Y 1
SFX 325 y ejšom .
PFX 325 Y 1
PFX 325 0 naj .
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 y ejším .
PFX 326 Y 1
PFX 326 0 naj .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 y ejších .
PFX 327 Y 1
PFX 327 0 naj .
SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 y ejšími .
PFX 328 Y 1
PFX 328 0 naj .
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 y ejšie .
PFX 329 Y 1
PFX 329 0 naj .
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 y ejšia .
PFX 330 Y 1
PFX 330 0 naj .
SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 y ejšej .
PFX 331 Y 1
PFX 331 0 naj .
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 y ejšiu .
PFX 332 Y 1
PFX 332 0 naj .
SFX 333 Y 1
SFX 333 y ejšou .
PFX 333 Y 1
PFX 333 0 naj .
SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 us y .
SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 um 0 .
SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 um am .
SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 um ach .
SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 um ami .
SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 iny ín .
SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 vo iev .
SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 o am .
SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 o ach .
SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 um á .
SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 um í .
SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 um ám .
SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 um ách .
SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 no ien .
SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 o á .
SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 o ám .
SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 o ách .
SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 aktum ákt .
SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 urdum úrd .
SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 ať ám .
SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 ať áš .
SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 ať á .
SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 ať áme .
SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 ať áte .
SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 ť jú .
SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 ť j .
SFX 360 N 1
SFX 360 ť jme .
SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 ť jte .
SFX 362 N 1
SFX 362 ť júc .
SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 o í .
SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 a mi .
SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 ata át .
SFX 366 N 1
SFX 366 0 í .
SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 0 am .
SFX 368 N 1
SFX 368 0 ach .
SFX 369 N 1
SFX 369 us i .
SFX 370 N 1
SFX 370 ľ lia .
SFX 371 N 1
SFX 371 ľka liek .
SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 esa ies .
SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 í ieho .
SFX 374 N 1
SFX 374 í iemu .
SFX 375 N 1
SFX 375 í om .
SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 í ie .
SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 í ia .
SFX 378 N 1
SFX 378 í ej .
